Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-444
Department officers and employees; interest in prison work prohibited.

No officer or employee of the Department of Correctional Services shall employ inmates on work in which he or she or any other officer has a personal interest. No such officer or employee shall be connected with or have any interest in the business or shops belonging to the department.

Laws 1897, c. 75, § 18, p. 338;

R.S.1913, § 7326;

C.S.1922, § 6986;

C.S.1929, § 83-923;

R.S.1943, § 83-444;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 39.